North Carolina, session 2025, HB142.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 3 of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 143C-3-3.1. Development and adoption of zero-based budget estimates.
(a) For purposes of this section, the term "zero-based budget" means a budget that reflects
the amount of funding deemed necessary to achieve the most cost-effective performance of each
State agency pursuant to an accompanying narrative delineating the tasks to be performed by the
State agency together with the goals and objectives for each State agency for a period not to
exceed four years. The budget shall have a zero dollar amount as its basis and shall not reflect
any prior appropriation amount, adjusted or otherwise.
(b) Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, the Governor shall begin
implementation of a zero-based budget. The Governor shall establish a schedule for phasing in
the zero-based budget over a period of four fiscal years, beginning with the State agencies in the
executive branch. The Governor shall identify which State agencies shall be required to submit
a zero-based budget for each of the four fiscal years. When a State agency submits its zero-based
budget for a fiscal year, the State agency shall develop its budget requests for appropriations on
a zero base, as if the budget for the State agency was being initiated for the first time. The State
agency's budget request to the Governor shall also be accompanied by a statement giving facts
and explanations of reasons for each item requested. The statement shall include a brief
explanation of the functions of each of the divisions, boards, commissions, officers, bureaus, or
institutions included within the State agency and comments on its policies and plans with
descriptive, quantitative, comparative, and other data regarding work accomplished and any other
relevant information."
SECTION 2. G.S. 143C-3-5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(h) For purposes of this subsection, the term "zero-based budget" is as defined in
G.S. 143C-3-3.1. Beginning with fiscal year 2027-2028, the Governor shall present budget
recommendations to the General Assembly that include zero-based budgets for certain State
agencies identified by the Governor pursuant to G.S. 143C-3-3.1. Beginning with fiscal year
2031-2032, the entire budget for the 2031-2033 fiscal biennium shall be a zero-based budget."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H142-v-1*